Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
10F

SURETY
INSURANCE

Cross References

Bail agents; sureties, see article 9N.

§431:10F-101 Requirements deemed met by
surety insurer. Whenever by law or by rule of any court, public official,
or public body, a surety bond is required or is permitted to be given, provided
the bond is otherwise proper and its conditions are guaranteed by an authorized
surety insurer or by an unauthorized surety insurer pursuant to article 8, part
II, the bond shall be approved and accepted and shall be deemed to fulfill all
requirements as to number of sureties, residence or status of sureties, and
other similar requirements, and no justification by the surety shall be
necessary. For the purpose of this section, surety bond shall also include a
recognizance, obligation, stipulation or undertaking. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next